Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.010

Scope of application.

This chapter shall apply to all bonds, notes and other evidences of indebtedness of the state authorized by the legislature after *the effective date of this chapter, unless otherwise provided in the authorizing acts.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For "the effective date of this chapter," see RCW 39.42.900.